Mississippi, session 2026, SB2378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 25-7-89, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-7-89.  Each court reporter shall receive * * * Two Dollars and Forty Cents ($2.40) Four Dollars ($4.00) per page for each transcript of testimony, or copy of such transcript, which shall be taxed as costs to each party or individual who may obtain such transcript or copy thereof.  The court reporter shall use such font, spacing and indentures, as practical, to reasonably minimize the number of printed pages.  The court reporter shall file with the clerk an original and one (1) copy of the transcript, for which copy no charge shall be made. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.